Missouri, session 2026, HB1658.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Section 376.1232, RSMo, is repealed and one new section enacted in lieu
thereof, to be known as section 376.1232, to read as follows:
376.1232. 1. Each health carrier or health benefit plan that offers or issues health
benefit plans which are delivered, issued for delivery, continued, or renewed in this state on or
after January 1, 2010, shall offer coverage for orthotic and prosthetic devices and services,
including original and replacement devices, as prescribed by a physician acting within the
scope of his or her practice.
2. For the purposes of this section, "health carrier" and "health benefit plan" shall
have the same meaning as defined in section 376.1350.
3. The amount of the benefit for orthotic and prosthetic devices and services under
this section shall be no less than the annual and lifetime benefit maximums applicable to the
basic health care services required to be provided under the health benefit plan. If the health
benefit plan does not include any annual or lifetime maximums applicable to basic health care
services, the amount of the benefit for orthotic and prosthetic devices and services shall not
be subject to an annual or lifetime maximum benefit level. Any co-payment, coinsurance,
deductible, and maximum out-of-pocket amount applied to the benefit for orthotic and
prosthetic devices and services shall be no more than the most common amounts applied to
the basic health care services required to be provided under the health benefit plan.
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 1658 2
4. The provisions of this section shall not apply to a supplemental insurance policy,
including a life care contract, accident-only policy, specified disease policy, hospital policy
providing a fixed daily benefit only, Medicare supplement policy, long-term care policy,
short-term major medical policies of six months or less duration, or any other supplemental
policy as determined by the director of the department of commerce and insurance.
✔